District of Columbia statutes.
2-1403.15

Enforcement of order.

(a)

The decision and order of the Commission shall be served on the respondent, with notice that, if the Commission determines that the respondent has not, after 30 calendar days following service of its order, corrected the unlawful discriminatory practice and complied with the order, the Commission will certify the matter to the Corporation Counsel, and to such other agencies as may be appropriate for enforcement.

(b)

The Corporation Counsel shall institute, in the name of the District, civil proceedings including the seeking of such restraining orders and temporary or permanent injunctions, as are necessary to obtain complete compliance with the Commission’s orders. In the event that successful civil proceedings do not result in securing such compliance, the Corporation Counsel shall institute criminal action.

(c)

No enforcement action shall be instituted pending review as provided in § 2-1403.14.

(d)

Nothing in this section shall be construed to deprive any person of rights in the criminal justice process.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title III, § 315, 24 DCR 6038
1973 Ed., § 6-2295.
1981 Ed., § 1-2555.
This section is referenced in § 2-1403.17.